Hawaii statutes.
§554G-4 Permitted trustees. If a
permitted trustee of a trust ceases to meet the criteria for a permitted
trustee as defined in section 554G-2, and there remains no trustee that meets
the requirements, the permitted trustee shall be deemed to have resigned as of
the time that the trustee ceases to meet the criteria. At that time, the
successor permitted trustee provided for in the trust instrument shall become
the permitted trustee of the trust. In the absence of any successor permitted
trustee provided for in the trust instrument, a trust advisor or protector
provided for in the trust instrument shall appoint a successor permitted
trustee. In the absence of a designated trust advisor or protector or in the
event of the failure of the designated trust advisor or protector to appoint a
successor permitted trustee, the circuit court sitting in probate, upon
application of any interested party, shall appoint a successor permitted
trustee. [L 2010, c 182, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 161, §4]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next